Arkansas, session 2025, HB1557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-4-103(6), concerning the definition of
"information technology" as it applies to the Division of Information
Systems, is amended to read as follows:
(6) “Information technology” means any component related to
information processing and wired and wireless telecommunications, including
data processing and telecommunications hardware, software, services,
planning, personnel, facilities, and training the use, development,
management, and application of computer systems, networks, and electronic
data processing to collect, store, process, transmit, retrieve, and secure
information and includes without limitation:
(1) Hardware;
(2) Software;
(3) Networking and telecommunications;
(4) Data management;
*LJH074*
03-11-2025 10:02:06 LJH074

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 HB1557
(5) Cybersecurity;
(6) Privacy;
(7) Third-party hosting; and
(8) Emerging technology;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-4-105(a)(2)(R), concerning the
development of a state information technology plan by the Division of
Information Systems, is amended to read as follows:
(R) Developing a state information technology plan that
shall establish a state-level mission, goals, and objectives for the use of
information technology Developing, implementing, and maintaining a unified
biennial statewide information technology plan through analysis of
information technology plans developed by each state agency that includes:
(i) A statewide disaster recovery plan that
identifies risks in each budget unit and directs state agencies to adopt risk
mitigation strategies, methods, and procedures to minimize risks;
(ii) A list of approved state agency projects by
category;
(iii) A detailed list of information technology
assets that are owned, leased, or employed by the state; and
(iv) Detailed budget information for each state
agency's approved technology plan;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
25-4-130. Statewide information technology — Duties and powers.
(a) In addition to the duties under § 25-4-105, the Division of
Information Systems shall:
(1) Administer the state's information technology;
(2) Provide statewide project management for any information
technology projects, including without limitation procedures for the:
(A) Assessment of viability, operational efficiencies, and
cost-benefit analysis of a proposed project;
(B) Determination of whether a joint project or system is
appropriate, including without limitation:
(i) Methods for the approval and prioritization of
03-11-2025 10:02:06 LJH074

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 HB1557
projects that aim to eliminate duplicative and overlapping services and
maximize information technology cost savings; and
(ii) Publication to each state agency of an annual
priority standards list that each project will be evaluated against for
approval;
(3)(A) Establish and enforce statewide minimum mandatory
standards for information technology that apply to all state agencies,
including without limitation executive departments.
(B) The standards of a state agency may be more stringent
than the statewide minimum standards, but in no case less than the minimum
standards.
(C) When federal standards apply that are stricter than
statewide minimum standards, the federal standards shall apply;
(4) Develop performance reporting guidelines and requirements
for information technology systems and conduct an annual review to compare
state agency plans and budgets with results and expenditures;
(5) Establish a centralized information technology governance
model to provide uniformity and procurement oversight for information
technology across state agencies, including without limitation:
(A) Defining clear roles, responsibilities, and decision-
making authority at the state and department levels;
(B) Creation of an information technology governance team
to prioritize initiatives and allocate resources effectively;
(C) Identifying areas for cost reduction by eliminating
duplication of efforts and procurement of information technology; and
(D) Increasing the state's purchasing power by negotiating
enterprise pricing for information technology; and
(6) Provide a report on the statewide information technology
plan and projects annually to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications
and Information Technology that includes without limitation:
(A) Overall metrics for system performance costs;
(B) A comparison of expected costs to actual costs after
project completion;
(C) User satisfaction analysis; and
(D) A project approval matrix for the next following
fiscal year.
03-11-2025 10:02:06 LJH074

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 HB1557
(b) A state agency shall not:
(1) Use state, federal, or public grant funds for or enter into
any agreement for the acquisition, development, or enhancement of any
information technology or any contract for information technology services
without approval from the Director of the Division of Information Systems
unless:
(A) The purchase price of the product or service is less
than or equal to five thousand dollars ($5,000) and the product is included
on an approved information technology list maintained by the division; or
(B) The purchase price of the product or service is more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but less than or equal to twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000), the product is listed on a statewide contract, and the
product is included on an approved information technology list maintained by
the division; or
(2) Develop or enter into a contract for the development of
customized software or information technology systems without written
authorization by the director.

/s/R. Scott Richardson

















03-11-2025 10:02:06 LJH074